Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-237 Duration of suspension. Every
order suspending any license shall specify the period during which suspension
will be effective. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 132, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next